bg-BG: Предназначение на нишката за работа с мъниста: Бродерия с мъниста; Тъкане на мъниста на стан; Тъкане на мъниста (с игла); Низане на скъпоценни камъни; Общо низане на бижута; Шиене на кожа; Бижута макраме; Низане на перли с възли; Дребни мъниста; Друго
ro-RO: Scenariu de utilizare pentru firul de broderie: Broderie cu mărgele; Țesut mărgele la gherghef; Țesut mărgele (ac); Înșirare pietre prețioase; Înșirare bijuterii generale; Cusut piele; Bijuterii macrameu; Înnodare perle; Mărgele de nisip; Altele
fr: Usage du fil de perlage: Broderie de perles; Tissage de perles sur métier; Tissage de perles (à l’aiguille); Enfilage de pierres précieuses; Enfilage de bijoux en général; Couture du cuir; Bijoux en macramé; Nouage de perles; Perles de rocaille; Autre
vi: Trường hợp sử dụng chỉ xâu hạt: Thêu đính hạt; Dệt đính hạt; Đan hạt (kim); Xỏ chuỗi đá quý; Xỏ chuỗi trang sức thông thường; Khâu da; Trang sức Macramé; Thắt nút ngọc trai; Hạt cườm nhỏ; Khác
ja: ビーズスレッド使用ケース: ビーズ刺繍; ビーズ織り; ビーズウィービング (針); 天然石のストリンギング; ジュエリーのストリンギング (一般); レザーステッチ; マクラメジュエリー; パールノッティング; シードビーズ; その他
de: Verwendungszweck des Perlenfadens: Perlenstickerei; Perlenweben (Webrahmen); Perlenweben (Nadel); Edelsteinfädeln; Allgemeines Auffädeln von Schmuck; Ledernähen; Makramee-Schmuck; Perlenknüpfen; Rocailles; Sonstige
it: thread per perline cassa d'uso: Ricamo con perline; Tessitura di perline al telaio; Tessitura di perline (con ago); Infilatura di pietre preziose; Infilatura generica di gioielli; Cucitura su pelle; Gioielli in macramè; Annodatura di perle; Perline di conteria; Altro
nl: Rijggaren gebruikstoepassing: Kralenborduren; Kralenweven; Kralenweven (naald); Edelstenen rijgen; Algemeen sieraden rijgen; Leer naaien; Macramé-sieraden; Parels knopen; Rocailles; Overige
zh-CN: 串珠线用途: 串珠刺绣; 织机串珠; 串珠编织（穿针）; 宝石串珠; 普通首饰串珠; 皮革缝线; 绳编首饰; 珍珠打结; 米珠; 其他
hr-HR: Slučaj upotrebe konca za perle: Vez perlicama; Tkanje perlicama; Tkanje perlicama (igla); Nizanje dragog kamenja; Opće nizanje nakita; Šivanje kože; Makrame nakit; Vezanje bisera; Sitne perlice; Ostalo
lt-LT: Karoliukų siūlo naudojimo paskirtis: Siuvinėjimas karoliukais; Audimas karoliukais; Pynimas karoliukais (adata); Brangakmenių vėrimas; Bendrasis papuošalų vėrimas; Odos siuvimas; Makramė papuošalai; Perlų vėrimas su mazgeliais; Smulkūs karoliukai; Kita
es: Caso de uso del hilo para tejido con cuentas: Bordado con abalorios; Tejido en telar de abalorios; Tejido de abalorios (aguja); Ensartado de piedras preciosas; Ensartado de joyería general; Costura de cuero; Joyería de macramé; Anudado de perlas; Mostacillas; Otro
zh-TW: 串珠線使用案例: 珠繡; 珠機編織; 串珠編織 (用針); 寶石串聯; 一般珠寶串聯; 皮革縫製; 花邊結飾品; 珍珠打結; 種子珠; 其他
th: การใช้งานของด้ายร้อยลูกปัด: การปักลูกปัด; การทอลูกปัดด้วยกี่; การร้อยลูกปัด (ใช้เข็ม); การร้อยอัญมณี; การร้อยเครื่องประดับทั่วไป; การเย็บหนัง; เครื่องประดับมาคราเม่; การมัดปมไข่มุก; ลูกปัดเม็ดทราย; อื่นๆ
ko: 비즈 실 용도: 비즈 자수; 룸 비즈 공예; 비즈 위빙(바늘); 젬스톤 스트링; 일반 주얼리 스트링; 가죽 스티칭; 마크라메 주얼리; 진주 매듭; 시드 비즈; 기타
pl: Zastosowanie nici do koralików: Haft koralikowy; Tkanie z koralików na krośnie; Tkanie z koralików (igłą); Nawlekanie kamieni szlachetnych; Nawlekanie biżuterii (ogólne); Szycie skóry; Biżuteria z makramy; Supełkowanie pereł; Drobne koraliki (seed beads); Inne
cs: Účel použití korálkovací nitě: Vyšívání korálky; Tkaní korálků; Šití korálků (jehlou); Navlékání drahokamů; Běžné navlékání šperků; Šití do kůže; Šperky makramé; Uzlíkování perel; Rokajl; Jiné
nb: Perletråd brukseske: Perlebroderi; Perleveving; Perleveving (nål); Træing av edelstener; Generell træing av smykker; Skinn- og lærsøm; Makramésmykker; Perleknyting; Frøperler; Annet
sk-SK: Prípad použitia korálkového vlákna: Vyšívanie korálikmi; Tkanie korálikov na stave; Tkanie korálikov (ihlou); Navliekanie drahokamov; Bežné navliekanie šperkov; Šitie kože; Makramé šperky; Viazanie perál; Rokajl; Iné
pt-BR: Uso pretendido do fio para bordado: Bordado com miçangas; Tear de miçangas; Tecelagem de miçangas (agulha); Encordoamento de pedras preciosas; Encordoamento de joias em geral; Costura em couro; Joias em macramê; Nó em pérolas; Miçangas; Outros
fi: Helmikirjailuketjun käyttötarkoitus: Helmikirjonta; Helmikuodonta; Helmikuodonta (neula); Jalokivien pujotus; Yleinen korujen pujotus; Nahan ompelu; Makrameekorut; Helmien solmeilu; Siemenhelmet; Muu
sv: Pärltrådens användningsområde: Pärlbroderi; Pärlvävning; Pärlsömnad (nål); Trädning av ädelstenar; Allmän smyckesträdning; Lädersömnad; Makramésmycken; Pärlknytning; Seedpärlor; Övrigt
sl-SI: Primer uporabe za nit za perlice: Vezenje perlic; Tkanje s perlicami; Tkanje perlic (z iglo); Nizanje dragih kamnov; Splošno nizanje nakita; Šivanje usnja; Nakit iz makrameja; Vozlanje biserov; Drobne perlice; Drugo
en: Beading thread use case: Bead embroidery; Bead looming; Bead weaving (needle); Gemstone stringing; General jewelry stringing; Leather stitching; Macramé jewelry; Pearl knotting; Seed beads; Other
da: Eksempel på brug af perletråd: Perlebroderi; Perlevævning; Perlesyning (nål); Trækning af ædelsten; Generel trækning af smykker; Lædersyning; Makramé-smykker; Perleknytning; Rocailles-perler; Andet
hu: Gyöngyfűző cérna felhasználási esete: Gyöngyhímzés; Gyöngyszövés; Gyöngyfűzés (tűvel); Drágakőfűzés; Általános ékszerfűzés; Bőrvarrás; Makramé ékszer; Gyöngycsomózás; Kásagyöngyök; Egyéb
ru: Сфера применения нити для бисероплетения: Вышивка бисером; Плетение бисером на станке; Бисероплетение (иглой); Нанизывание самоцветов; Универсальное нанизывание украшений; Сшивание кожи; Украшения макраме; Вязание узлов для жемчуга; Бисер; Другое
pt-PT: Caso de utilização do fio de missangas: Bordado com missangas; Trabalho com missangas em tear; Tecelagem de missangas (agulha); Enfiamento de pedras preciosas; Enfiamento de joalharia em geral; Costura em pele; Joalharia em macramé; Amarração de pérolas; Missangas; Outro
el: Θήκη χρήσης νήματος με χάντρες: Κέντημα με χάντρες; Ύφανση χαντρών σε αργαλειό; Πλέξιμο χαντρών (με βελόνα); Πέρασμα πολύτιμων λίθων σε κλωστή; Πέρασμα κοσμημάτων σε κλωστή (γενική χρήση); Ράψιμο δέρματος; Κοσμήματα μακραμέ; Δέσιμο μαργαριταριών; Χάντρες (σποράκια); Άλλο
tr: Boncuk ipliği kullanım amacı: Boncuk işlemesi; Tezgahta boncuk işleme; Boncuk dokuma (iğne); Doğal taş dizme; Genel takı dizme; Deri dikişi; Makrome takı; İnci düğümleme; Kum boncuklar; Diğer